Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 24

ALLOWANCE
AND SALARY FOR LEGISLATORS

Section

24-1 Allowance for incidental expenses

24-1.5 Payment of legislative salaries

24-2 Allowance for non-Oahu legislator during
session

24-3 Allowance for expenses while traveling on
official

legislative business during a session
within the State

24-4 Allowance for expenses while on official
legislative

business during period of recess and
interim official

legislative business

24-5 Allowance for expenses while traveling on
official

legislative business without the State

24-6 Travel expenses

24-7 Legislative contingency funds

24-8 Appropriation and payment

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1984, c 171, §1(2).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next